North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 3. The Governor.
§ 147-16.
Records kept; certain original applications preserved; notice of commutations.

The Governor shall cause to be kept the following records:

A register of all applications for pardon, or for commutation of any sentence, with a list of the official signatures and recommendations in favor of such application.

An account of all his official expenses and disbursements, including the incidental expenses of his department, and the rewards offered by him for the apprehension of criminals.These records and the originals of all applications, petitions, and recommendations and reports therein mentioned shall be preserved in the office of the Governor, but when applications for offices are refused he may, in his discretion, return the papers referring to the application.

The Governor shall, unless otherwise requested by any person listed in subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection, provide notice of the commutation of any sentence within 20 days after the commutation by first-class mail to the following at the last known address:

The victim or victims of the crime for which the sentence was imposed;

The victims’ spouse, children, and parents;

Any other members of the victims’ family who request in writing to be notified; and

The Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, ss. 29, 30; 1870-1, c. 111; Code, ss. 3322, 3323; Rev., s. 5331; C.S., s. 7639; 1983, c. 913, s. 47; 1995, c. 507, s. 19.3(a); 1997-443, s. 21.4(b); 2001-138, s. 2; 2011-291, s. 2.54.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 2.54, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety” for “Joint Legislative Corrections, Crime Control, and Juvenile Justice Oversight Committee” in subdivision (b)(4).

§ 147-16.1.
Publication of executive orders.

The Governor must submit Executive Orders to the Secretary of State, who must compile, index, and publish the Executive Orders. The Governor’s office shall also send a copy of each executive order to the President of the Senate, to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, to the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives and to the Principal Clerk of the Senate.

History.

1971, c. 1196; 1985, c. 479, ss. 150-152; c. 746, s. 8; 1991, c. 103, s. 1; 418, s. 14.

§ 147-16.2.
Duration of boards and councils created by executive officials; extensions.

Any executive order of the Governor that creates a board, committee, council, or commission expires two years after the effective date of the executive order, unless the Governor specifies an expiration date in the order; provided, however, that any such executive order that was in effect on July 1, 1983, expires on June 30, 1985, unless the Governor specified a different expiration date in any such order. The Governor may extend any such executive order before it expires for additional periods of up to two years by doing so in writing; copies of the writing shall be filed by the Governor with the Secretary of State and the Legislative Library.

Any other State board, committee, council, or commission created by the Governor or by any other State elective officer specified in Article III of the North Carolina Constitution expires two years after it was created; provided, however, that any such board, committee, council, or commission existing as of July 1, 1984, expires on June 30, 1985, unless it was due to expire on an earlier date. The elective officer creating any such board, committee, council, or commission may extend the board, committee, council, or commission before it expires for additional periods of up to two years by doing so in writing; copies of the writing shall be filed by the elective officer with the Secretary of State and the Legislative Library.

Any State board, committee, council, or commission created by any official in the executive branch of State government, other than by those officials specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, expires two years after it was created; provided, however, that any board, committee, council, or commission existing as of July 1, 1984, expires on June 30, 1985, unless it was due to expire on an earlier date. The Governor may extend any such board, committee, council, or commission before it expires for additional periods of up to two years by executive order; copies of the executive order shall be filed by the Governor with the Secretary of State and the Legislative Library.The words, “official in the executive branch of State government,” as used in this section, do not include officials of counties, cities, towns, villages, other municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the State or any agencies of such subdivision, or local boards of education, other local public districts, units or bodies of any kind, or community colleges as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

, or private corporations created by act of the General Assembly.

Any elective officer specified in subsection (b) of this section and any other official in the executive branch of State government who creates a board, committee, council, or commission shall do so in writing and shall file copies of the writing with the Secretary of State and the Legislative Library.

History.

1983, c. 733, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1053; 2004-203, s. 50(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-203, s. 50.(b), effective August 17, 2004, deleted “State” preceding “Legislative Library” in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d), and inserted “of this section” following “(b)” in subsections (c) and (d).

§ 147-16.3.
Timely nominations if legislative body must confirm.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever:

A statute specifies that an office shall be filled by nomination by the Governor and confirmation by the General Assembly or by one house thereof, and

The statute specifies that the nominee shall take office without legislative action if the General Assembly adjourns without action being taken or fails to take action within a specified time, and

The Governor fails to nominate a person for the office by May 15 of a regular session of the General Assembly during an odd-numbered year or by June 7 of a regular session of the General Assembly during an even-numbered year, and

The appropriate legislative body does not act on the nomination before it next adjourns for more than 10 days or sine die,

the nominee shall serve only on an interim basis until 60 days after the convening of the next regular session of the General Assembly, subject to rejection or approval by the appropriate legislative body before that time.

History.

1987, c. 867, s. 4.

§ 147-17.
May employ counsel in cases wherein State is interested.

No department, officer, agency, institution, commission, bureau or other organized activity of the State which receives support in whole or in part from the State shall employ private counsel, except with the approval of the Governor. The Governor shall give his approval only if the Attorney General has advised him, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, that it is impracticable for the Attorney General to render the legal services. In any case or proceeding, civil or criminal, in or before any court or agency of this State or any other state or the United States, or in any other matter in which the State of North Carolina is interested, the Governor may employ private counsel as he may deem proper or necessary to represent the interest of the State, and may fix the compensation for their services, subject to the provisions of subsection (c1) of this section. This subsection does not apply to private counsel retained by the Judicial Department for the defense of an official or employee of the Department in any action arising from conduct undertaken in the course of the official’s or employee’s official duties and in which the Attorney General has declined to provide the litigation services.

The Attorney General shall be counsel for all departments, officers, agencies, institutions, commissions, bureaus or other organized activities of the State which receive support in whole or in part from the State. Whenever the Attorney General shall advise the Governor that it is impracticable for him to render legal services to any State agency, officer, institution, commission, bureau or other organized activity, or to defend a State employee or former employee as authorized by Article 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the Governor may authorize the employment of private counsel, as in his judgment, should be employed to render such services, and may fix the compensation for their services.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (c1) of this section, the Governor may direct that the compensation fixed under this section for private counsel shall be paid out of appropriations or other funds credited to the appropriate department, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State or out of the Contingency and Emergency Fund.

(c1)

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section and G.S. 143C-4-4(b), no State funds shall be withdrawn from the State treasury to pay for litigation services provided by private counsel except as expressly authorized by an appropriation of the General Assembly. As used in this subsection, litigation services include legal work conducted in anticipation of, or in preparation for, any suit or action. As used in this section, private counsel includes any licensed attorney retained by, engaged by, or otherwise representing a department, officer, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State but does not include a licensed attorney who holds a permanent budgeted position in either the Department of Justice or the applicable department, officer, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State.

In those instances when a department, officer, agency, institution, commission, bureau, or other organized activity of the State which receives support in whole or in part from the State shall employ private counsel other than the Attorney General as permitted by law, such employed counsel shall allocate authority between counsel and the State client in conformance with Rule 1.2 of the North Carolina Rules of Professional Conduct. In those instances where more than one counsel is providing legal representation, counsel, or service on a legal matter on behalf of a State client, the client shall designate in writing which of its legal counsel possesses final decision-making authority on behalf of the State client, and other co-counsel shall, consistent with the Rules of Professional Conduct, cooperate with such designated lead counsel.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 6; 1870-1, c. 111; 1873-4, c. 160, s. 2; 1883, c. 71; Code, ss. 3320, 3324; 1901, c. 744; Rev., s. 5332; C.S., s. 7640; 1925, c. 207, s. 3; 1961, c. 1007; 1963, c. 1009; 1967, c. 1092, s. 2; 1985, c. 479, s. 136; 2011-145, s. 22.4; 2017-57, s. 6.7(a); 2021-180, s. 16.10(d).

Cross References.

As to defense of State employees, see

G.S. 143-300.2

through

G.S. 143-300.5

.

§ 147-18.
To designate “Indian Day.”

The Governor of North Carolina is hereby empowered to set aside some day which shall be called “Indian Day” on which Indian lore shall receive emphasis in the public schools of the State and among the citizens of North Carolina.

History.

Resolutions 54, 1937, p. 957.

§ 147-19.
To appoint a day of thanksgiving.

The Governor is directed to set apart a day in every year, and by proclamation give notice thereof, as a day of solemn and public thanksgiving to Almighty God for past blessings and of supplication for His continued kindness and care over us as a State and a nation.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 39; Code, s. 3334; Rev., s. 5333; C.S., s. 7641.

§ 147-20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 867, s. 13.

§ 147-21.
Form and contents of applications for pardon.

Every application for pardon must be made to the Governor in writing, signed by the party convicted, or by some person in his behalf. And every such application shall contain the grounds and reasons upon which the executive pardon is asked, and shall be in every case accompanied by a certified copy of the indictment, and the verdict and judgment of the court thereon.

History.

1869-70, c. 171; 1870-1, c. 61; Code, s. 3336; Rev., s. 5334; C.S., s. 7642.

Cross References.

As to the Governor’s power to pardon, see N.C. Const., Art. III, § 5.

§ 147-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 309.

§ 147-23.
Conditional pardons may be granted.

In any case in which the Governor is authorized by the Constitution to grant a pardon he may, upon the petition of the prisoner, grant it, subject to such conditions, restrictions, and limitations as he considers proper and necessary, and he may issue his warrant to all proper officers to carry such pardon into effect in such manner as he thinks proper.

History.

1905, c. 356; Rev., s. 5335; C.S., s. 7643.

§ 147-24.
Governor’s duties when conditions of pardon violated.

If a prisoner who has been pardoned upon conditions to be observed and performed by him violates such conditions, or any of them, the Governor, upon receiving information of such violation, shall forthwith cause him to be arrested and detained until the case can be examined by him. The Governor shall examine the case of such prisoner, and if it appears by his own admission or by such evidence as the Governor may require that he has violated the conditions of his pardon, the Governor shall order him remanded and confined for the unexpired term of his sentence; said confinement, if the prisoner is under any other sentence of imprisonment at the time of said order, to begin upon expiration of such sentence. In computing the period of his confinement the time between the conditional pardon and subsequent arrest shall not be taken to be a part of the time of his sentence. If it appears to the Governor that he has not broken the conditions of his conditional pardon he shall be released and his conditional pardon shall remain in force.

History.

1905, c. 356, ss. 2, 3; Rev., s. 5336; C.S., s. 7644.

Cross References.

As to the Governor’s power to pardon, see N.C. Const., Art. III, § 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For review of this section, see 1 N.C.L. Rev. 47 (1923).

§ 147-25.
Duty of sheriff and clerk on pardon granted.

If a prisoner is pardoned conditionally or unconditionally, or his punishment is commuted, the officer to whom the warrant for such purpose is issued shall, as soon as may be after executing it, make return thereof, signed by him, with his doing thereon, to the Governor’s office, and shall file in the office of the clerk of the court in which the offender was convicted an attested copy of the warrant and return, and the clerk shall file the same in his office and subjoin a brief abstract thereof to the record of the conviction and sentence, and at the next regular term of said court said warrant shall be entered upon the minutes of the court.

History.

1905, c. 356, s. 4; Rev., s. 5337; C.S., s. 7645.

§ 147-26.
To procure great seal of State; its description.

The Governor shall procure for the State a seal, which shall be called the great seal of the State of North Carolina, and shall be two and one-quarter inches in diameter, and its design shall be a representation of the figures of Liberty and Plenty, looking toward each other, but not more than half-fronting each other and otherwise disposed as follows: Liberty, the first figure, standing, her pole with cap on it in her left hand and a scroll with the word “Constitution” inscribed thereon in her right hand. Plenty, the second figure, sitting down, her right arm half extended towards Liberty, three heads of grain in her right hand, and in her left, the small end of her horn, the mouth of which is resting at her feet, and the contents of the horn rolling out.

The background on the seal shall contain a depiction of mountains running from left to right to the middle of the seal and an ocean running from right to left to the middle of the seal. A side view of a three-masted ship shall be located on the ocean and to the right of Plenty. The date “May 20, 1775” shall appear within the seal and across the top of the seal. The date “April 12, 1776” shall appear within the seal and across the bottom of the seal. The words “esse quam videri” shall appear at the bottom around the perimeter. The words “THE GREAT SEAL of the STATE of NORTH CAROLINA” shall appear around the perimeter. No other words, figures or other embellishments shall appear on the seal.

It shall be the duty of the Governor to file in the office of Secretary of State an impression of the great seal, certified to under his hand and attested by the Secretary of State, which impression so certified the Secretary of State shall carefully preserve among the records of his office.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 35; 1883, c. 392; Code, ss. 3328, 3329; 1893, c. 145; Rev., s. 5339; C.S., s. 7646; 1971, c. 167, s. 1; 1983, c. 257, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

As to the great seal of the State of North Carolina,

see opinion of Attorney General to Dr. H.G. Jones, Department of Archives and History, 41 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 214 (1971).

§ 147-27.
Affixing great seal a second time to public papers.

In all cases where any person may find it necessary to have the great seal of the State put again to any public paper, other than a grant for lands, he may prefer his petition to the Governor and Council, who shall, if they deem the same proper, direct the seal to be put thereto.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 38; Code, s. 3333; Rev., s. 5338; C.S., s. 7647.

§ 147-28.
To procure seals for departments and courts.

The Governor shall also procure a seal for each department of the State government to be used for attesting and authenticating grants, proclamations, commissions, and other public acts, in such manner as may be directed by law and the usage established in the public offices; also a seal for every court of record in the State, for the purpose of authenticating the papers and records of such court. All such seals shall be delivered to the proper officers, who shall give a receipt therefor and be accountable for their safekeeping.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, ss. 35, 37; 1883, c. 71; Code, ss. 3328, 3332; Rev., s. 5340; C.S., s. 7648.

§ 147-29.
Seal of Department of State described.

The seal of the Department of State shall be two inches in diameter and shall be of the same design as the great seal of the State, with the words “State of North Carolina, Department of State,” surrounding the figures.

History.

1883, c. 238; Code, s. 3330; Rev., s. 5341; C.S., s. 7649.

§ 147-30.
To provide new seals when necessary.

Whenever the great seal of the State shall be lost or so worn or defaced as to render it unfit for use, the Governor shall provide a new one and when such new one is provided the former one, if it can be found, shall be destroyed in the presence of the Governor. Whenever the seal of any department of the State shall be lost or so worn or defaced as to render it unfit for use, a new seal shall be provided by the head of the department and the former one, if it can be found, shall be destroyed in the presence of the head of the department. Whenever the seal of any court of record shall be lost or so worn or defaced as to render it unfit for use, the board of county commissioners of the county in which such court is situate shall provide a new one and the old one, if it can be found, shall be destroyed in the presence of the chairman of the board of county commissioners of such county.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 36; Code, s. 3331; Rev., s. 5342; C.S., s. 7650; 1943, c. 632.

§ 147-31.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 913, s. 48.

§ 147-31.1.
Office space and expenses for Governor-elect and Lieutenant Governor-elect; and other Council of State members-elect.

The Department of Administration, upon request of the Governor-elect and Lieutenant Governor-elect, made after the general election for these respective offices, is empowered and directed to provide suitable office space and office staff for each such official for the period between the general election and inauguration.The Department of Administration shall provide, for the fiscal years in which general election and inauguration of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall occur, such sums, not in excess of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) for the Governor-elect, and not in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the Lieutenant Governor-elect, as may be necessary for the salary of the staffs and the payment of office expenses of each such official during such interim.

The Department of Administration, upon request of any other member-elect of the Council of State who is not an incumbent in that office, shall provide for such persons suitable office space and office staff for each such official for the period between the general election and inauguration.The Department of Administration shall provide, for the fiscal years in which general election and inauguration of such persons occurs, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the salary of the staffs and the payment of office expenses of each such official during such interim. If there are more than two such persons, such services and payments shall be made from the Contingency and Emergency Fund upon approval of the Council of State.

History.

1965, c. 407; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 48.

§ 147-32.
Compensation for surviving spouses of Governors.

All surviving spouses of Governors of the State of North Carolina, who make written request to the Director of the Budget, shall be paid the sum of twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) a year in equal monthly installments, out of the State Treasury upon warrants duly drawn thereon. This compensation shall terminate upon the subsequent remarriage of the surviving spouse.

History.

1937, c. 416; 1947, c. 897, ss. 1, 2; 1955, c. 1314; 1977, c. 554; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 63; 1987, c. 738, s. 40.

§ 147-33.
Compensation and expenses of Lieutenant Governor.

The salary of the Lieutenant Governor shall be set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act. In addition to this salary, the Lieutenant Governor shall be paid an annual expense allowance in the sum of eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500). In addition to the salary set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, longevity pay shall be paid on the same basis as is provided to employees of the State who are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

History.

1911, c. 103; C.S., s. 3862; 1945, c. 1; 1953, c. 1, s. 1; 1963, c. 1050; 1967, c. 1170, s. 1; 1971, c. 913; 1977, c. 802, s. 42.6; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 40; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 32; 1983, c. 761, s. 211; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1987, c. 738, s. 32(b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).